Hawaii statutes.
PART 4.
EXEMPT PROPERTY AND ALLOWANCES

§560:2-401 Applicable law. This part
applies to the estate of a decedent who dies domiciled in this State. Rights
to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance for a decedent
who dies not domiciled in this State are governed by the law of the decedent's
domicile at death. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next